Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
Mississippi State Veterans Home

§ 35-1-19.
Establishment of Mississippi State Veterans Home; establishment of other veterans homes.

There is hereby authorized to be established by the State Veterans Affairs Board, the Mississippi State Veterans Home on a site to be determined by the State Veterans Affairs Board, with the approval of the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Governor’s Office of General Services, when funds are made available for such purpose by any agency of the federal government or other sources. The object and purpose of the establishment of the Mississippi State Veterans Home shall be to provide domiciliary care and other related services for eligible veterans of the State of Mississippi.

One or more additional veterans homes or domiciliaries are hereby authorized to be established by the State Veterans Affairs Board on sites in northern, central or southern Mississippi, to be determined by the State Veterans Affairs Board, with the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, when funds are made available for such purpose by any agency of the federal government or other sources. The Veterans Affairs Board shall give the three (3) regions, northern, southern and central priority as to where the veterans home shall be located, with the northern region having first priority, the southern region having the next level priority and the central region being third in order of priority. The object and purpose of the establishment of such additional homes or domiciliaries shall be to provide domiciliary care and other related services for eligible veterans of the State of Mississippi. The State Veterans Affairs Board shall not be required to obtain certificates of need to carry out the intent and purpose of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 307; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1993).

§ 35-1-21.
Governing authority; operation and maintenance; purchase of services, commodities, etc., from federal government; State Veterans Affairs Board authorized to operate and maintain state veterans homes without contracting for management purposes with any nongovernmental entity or United States Department of Veterans Affairs; board authorized to hire administrators and other personnel; State Department of Health to conduct certification survey of veterans home in Collins.

Upon the establishment of the Mississippi State Veterans Home, and any additional homes as may be established, the Mississippi State Veterans Affairs Board is hereby designated as the governing authority of any such facilities. The operation and maintenance of all veterans homes shall meet the standards of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs with regard to the operation of state veterans homes.

The State Veterans Affairs Board may contract with nongovernmental entities or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to operate and provide services to state veterans homes. The board may contract with the vendor whose proposal is most advantageous to the state and veterans, taking into consideration cost factors, program suitability factors, management plan, delivery of care and service to residents, excellence of program design, key personnel, corporate or company resources, financial condition of the vendor, corporate experience and past performance, and any other requirements deemed necessary by the board and expressed in its solicitation for proposals. Contract(s) awarded under this section may be for periods exceeding one (1) year. The board is not required to select the vendor offering the lowest cost proposal, but shall select the vendor who, in the board’s discretion, offers the proposal most advantageous to the State of Mississippi and veterans. When any contract is awarded, the reason(s) for the awarding of the contract shall be entered on the minutes of the board. The provisions of this paragraph shall supersede any rule or regulation of the Public Procurement Review Board to the contrary.

The State Veterans Affairs Board may, as permitted by federal laws or regulations, purchase from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, from contracts established by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or through other sharing agreements between the board and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, services, commodities, supplies and equipment for use in operation of, and provision of care to residents of, the state veterans homes when such purchases or agreements are advantageous to the veterans and the state.

The State Veterans Affairs Board may operate and maintain the state veterans homes without entering into any contract for management purposes with any nongovernmental entity or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to operate the homes. In such instances, the State Veterans Affairs Board shall be solely responsible for the operation and maintenance of the state veterans homes and shall hire the administrators and all other personnel for the veterans homes. The mission of the State Veterans Affairs Board in managing the state veterans homes shall be to provide domiciliary care and other related services for eligible veterans in the most cost efficient manner.

The State Department of Health shall perform an initial certification survey of the State Veterans Home in Collins, Mississippi, on or about July 1, 2000. The purpose of this initial survey is to provide a baseline for measuring the quality of care during the period for which this section applies. In addition to the initial certification survey, the State Department of Health shall, as appropriate and in its discretion, conduct periodic follow-up certification surveys, during the period for which this section applies, of the State Veterans Home in Collins, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 612, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 338, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002; Laws, 2019, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 35-1-23.
Acceptance and use of federal funds.

The Mississippi State Veterans Home and additional homes authorized by Section 35-1-7 and Sections 35-1-19 through 35-1-29 are authorized to accept funds from any source whatever, including the federal government or any department or agency thereof. All such funds received by the veterans home including funds from the United States or any federal agency or program for the support of persons housed or buried on the grounds of the Mississippi State Veterans Home and additional homes shall be used by the State Veterans Affairs Board to pay maintenance, operational and administrative expenses and to further the object and purpose of the Mississippi State Veterans Home and additional homes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1993).

§ 35-1-25.
Determination of staffing needs; purchasing of equipment.

It shall be the duty of the Mississippi State Veterans Affairs Board to determine the need and, within available funds for such purpose, to provide adequate staffing to operate the Mississippi State Veterans Home and such additional homes as may be constructed. The board is authorized, within available funds for such purpose, to purchase such equipment as necessary to facilitate the establishment and operation of the veterans homes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1993).

§ 35-1-27.
Standards for admissions and dismissals; rules and regulations; funds paid by state veterans homes residents for their monthly expenses at veterans homes to be considered special funds held in fiduciary capacity for their benefit.

The Mississippi Veterans Affairs Board shall determine and set conditions and standards for admission and dismissal of all persons to and from the Mississippi State Veterans Home and such additional homes as may be constructed. In addition, the board shall promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary for the government of the Mississippi State Veterans Home and such additional homes as may be constructed. Such rules and regulations shall include the establishment of rates for patient care within the patient’s ability to pay. All funds paid to the board by the veteran residents of state veterans homes to fund their monthly expenses at the state veterans homes shall be considered to be special funds held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of the residents of the state veterans homes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 6; Laws, 2008, ch. 361, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 506, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2011).

§ 35-1-29.
Acceptance and use of gifts and donations.

The Mississippi State Veterans Affairs Board is empowered to receive and accept gifts or donations, or both, for the benefit of the Mississippi State Veterans Home and such additional homes as may be constructed, and the same shall be used for carrying out the object and purpose of the veterans homes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1993).

§ 35-1-31.
Mississippi State Veterans’ Home in Jackson designated as “The General Hilton R. ‘Jack’ Vance Mississippi State Veterans’ Home.”

The Mississippi State Veterans’ Home located in Jackson, Mississippi, shall be renamed the General Hilton R. “Jack” Vance Mississippi State Veterans’ Home. The State Veterans’ Affairs Board shall prepare a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the General Hilton R. “Jack” Vance Mississippi State Veterans’ Home, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of General Hilton R. “Jack” Vance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2005).

§ 35-1-32.
Mississippi State Veterans’ Home in Kosciusko, Mississippi, designated as the “Brigadier General Martha Jo Leslie Mississippi State Veterans’ Home.

The Mississippi State Veterans’ Home located in Kosciusko, Mississippi, shall be renamed the “Brigadier General Martha Jo Leslie Mississippi State Veterans’ Home.” The State Veterans’ Affairs Board shall prepare a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the Brigadier General Martha Jo Leslie Mississippi State Veterans’ Home, which states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of Brigadier General Martha Jo Leslie.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2013).

§ 35-1-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2010, ch. 306, § 1, effective from and after passage, (approved February 24, 2010.)

§35-1-33. [Laws, 2008, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.)]